California statutes. Education Code
(g) For purposes of calculating the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, increase the amount of funding per
 unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.10 by 13 percent and then multiply by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142 for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, increase the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the 2020–21 fiscal year by 10 percent, and then adjust that amount by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142 for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and shall also include the inflation factor of 2.31 percent instead of zero as described in Section 56836.142 for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(3) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, increase the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the 2021–22 fiscal year by 14
 percent.

(4) For the 2023–24
 to the 2025–26 fiscal years, inclusive, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year shall be adjusted by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142 for the current fiscal year.

(5) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, increase the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the 2025–26 fiscal year by 46 percent.

(6) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year shall be adjusted by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142
 for the current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 126.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.148.

(a) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by multiplying the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (a) of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (a) Section 56836.144 for the corresponding special education local plan area.

(b) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by multiplying the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily
 attendance computed in subdivision (a) of Section 56836.144 for the corresponding special education local plan area.

(c) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by adding the products of the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (c) of Section 56836.146 multiplied by the funded average daily attendance for each member local educational agency and charter school that is a local educational agency for purposes of special education computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(d) For the 2023–24
 to 2025–26 fiscal years, inclusive, the Superintendent shall determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by adding the products of the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (d) of Section 56836.146 multiplied by the funded average daily attendance for each member local educational agency and charter school that is a local educational agency for purposes of special education computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(e) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall
 determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by adding the products of the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (e) of Section 56836.146 multiplied by the funded average daily attendance for each member local educational agency and charter school that is a local educational agency for purposes of special education computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(f) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall determine the base grant funding for each special education local plan area by adding the products of the amount funded per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area computed in subdivision (f) of Section 56836.146 multiplied by the funded average daily attendance for each member local educational agency and charter school that is a local
 educational agency for purposes of special education computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(g) For purposes of calculating the base funding for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (g)
 of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (a) of Section 56836.144.

(2) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (a) of Section 56836.144.

(3) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (g)
 of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(4) For the 2023–24 to 2025–26 fiscal years, inclusive, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of
 Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(5) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g) of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(6) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in paragraph (6) of subdivision (g) of Section 56836.146 by the funded average daily attendance computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.144.

(h) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make publicly available the amount of special education funding each local educational agency generates for their special education local plan area pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(i) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, each special education local plan area shall report to their member local educational agencies no later than 30 days after receiving
 their apportionment the amount of funding each local educational agency generates pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(j) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, each special education local plan area shall, at a minimum, allocate special education funding to all of its member local educational agencies equal to the total sum of base grant funding, calculated pursuant to this section, allocated to all of its member local educational agencies in the 2022–23 fiscal year multiplied by the sum of one plus the inflation factor, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.142 for the 2023–24 fiscal year, and then multiplied by the sum of one plus the percent change
 in funded average daily attendance of its member local educational agencies from the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2023–24 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.144.

(k) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a member local educational agency from allocating funds back to their special education local plan area for purposes of providing regionalized or other programmatic services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 127.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.15.

Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of General Fund moneys that the special education local plan area may claim:

(a) Determine the total amount of property taxes for the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 2572 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(b) Calculate the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 56836.148 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(c) Subtract the amount computed in subdivision (a) from the amount computed in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 76.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Computation of Adjustment [56836.156. - 56836.159.]

56836.156.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine the statewide total average daily attendance used for the purposes of Section 56836.08 for the 2001–02 fiscal year. For the purposes of this calculation, the 2000–01 second principal average daily attendance for the court, community school, and special education programs served by the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area shall be used in lieu of the average daily attendance used for that agency for the purposes of Section 56836.08.

(b) The superintendent shall divide one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) by the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For each special education local plan area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 for the 2001–02 fiscal year by the quotient determined pursuant to subdivision (b). This increase shall be effective beginning in the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), for the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 by the ratio of the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b) to the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2000–01 fiscal year. This increase shall be effective beginning in the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(e) The superintendent shall increase the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2001–02 fiscal year by the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) The funds provided in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall be used for the costs of any state-mandated special education programs and services established pursuant to Sections 56000 to 56885, inclusive, and Sections 3000 to 4671, inclusive, of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections read on or before July 1, 2000. These funds shall be considered in full satisfaction of, and are in lieu of, any reimbursable mandate claims relating to special education programs and services, with the exception of the programs and services delineated in subdivision (g). By providing this funding, the state in no way concedes the existence of any unfunded special education reimbursable mandate. These funds shall be used exclusively for programs operated under this part and, as a first priority, for the following programs, which shall be deemed to be fully funded within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code:

(1) Community advisory committees established pursuant to Sections 56190 to 56192, inclusive, and Section 56194, as these sections read on July 1, 2000.

(2) Governance structure established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56195.3, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(3) Enrollment caseloads established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56362, and Section 56363.3, as these sections read on July 1, 2000.

(4) Extended school year established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3043 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(5) Resource specialist program established pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 56362, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(6) Maximum age limit established pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56026, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(7) Interim placements established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56325, as this section read on July 1, 2000, and Section 3067 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as this section read on December 31, 1994.

(8) Written consent established pursuant to Sections 56321 and 56346, as these sections read on July 1, 2000.

(9) Preschool transportation programs for ages 3 to 5, inclusive, not requiring intensive services (Not-RIS) established pursuant to Section 56441.14, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(10) Special education for pupils ages 3 to 5, inclusive, and 18 to 21, inclusive, established pursuant to Section 56026, as this section read on July 1, 2000.

(11) With the exception of the programs delineated in subdivision (g), any other state-mandated special education programs and services established by Sections 56000 to 56885, inclusive, and Sections 3000 to 4671, inclusive, of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections read on or before July 1, 2000, whether or not such a mandate has been found by the Commission on State Mandates. Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code, these funds shall be deemed to be additional revenue specifically intended to fund the costs of any such state-mandated special education programs and services.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), the following existing mandate test claim remains subject to the normal mandate procedure, including judicial review, if any: behavioral interventions established pursuant to Section 56523 and Sections 3001 and 3052 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections read on July 1, 2000 (CSM-4464 filed by the San Diego Unified School District, the San Joaquin County Office of Education, and the Butte County Office of Education). The exclusion of this claim from subdivision (f) in no way constitutes a concession by the state that any unfunded special education mandate exists.

(h) Within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated for purposes of this section are not specifically intended to fund any state-mandated special education programs and services resulting from amendments enacted after July 1, 2000, to any of the following statutes and regulations:

(1) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), if the amendments result in circumstances where state law exceeds federal law.

(2) Federal regulations implementing the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (34 C.F.R. 300 and 303), if the amendments result in circumstances where state law exceeds federal law.

(3) Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000).

(4) Sections 3000 to 4671, inclusive, of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(i) State funds otherwise allocated to each special education local plan area pursuant to Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30 and appropriated through the annual Budget Act shall supplement and not supplant these funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.157.

(a) Commencing with the 2001–02 fiscal year to the 2010–11 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be appropriated, on a one-time basis each fiscal year, from the General Fund for allocation to school districts on a per pupil basis. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall compute the amount per pupil by dividing twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) by the total average daily attendance, excluding attendance for regional occupational centers and programs, adult education, and programs operated by the county superintendents of schools, for all pupils in kindergarten through grade 12 in all school districts as used by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the second principal apportionment for the 1999–2000 fiscal year. Each school district’s allocation shall equal the per pupil amount times the district’s average daily attendance as reported to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the second principal apportionment for the 1999–2000 fiscal year. The amount allocated to each school district shall be the same in all subsequent fiscal years as it is in the first fiscal year.

(1) In any fiscal year in which the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution are operative, the annual appropriation shall not be required to be made.

(2) The Director of Finance shall notify, in writing, the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Controller, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction no later than May 14 that the appropriation for the following fiscal year is not required, pursuant to paragraph (1). If an appropriation is not made for a specific fiscal year, or years, it shall instead be made in the fiscal year, or years, immediately succeeding the final payment pursuant to subdivision (a).

(b) (1) From the funds appropriated for purposes of this section in subdivision (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the following:

(A) From the appropriation provided by subdivision (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section, the amount of ten million eight hundred thousand dollars ($10,800,000) shall be allocated by the superintendent to county offices of education on an equal per pupil amount. The superintendent shall determine the per pupil amount by dividing ten million eight hundred thousand dollars ($10,800,000) by the total statewide county special education pupil count only, reported by county offices of education as of December 1999. The allotment for each county office of education shall be the per pupil amount times the county’s special education pupil count reported as of December 1999.

(B) From the appropriation provided by subdivision (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section, the amount of two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) shall be allocated by the superintendent to SELPAs that existed for the 1999–2000 fiscal year. The superintendent shall determine the amount of each agency’s allotment by dividing the two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) by the total statewide special education pupil count as of December 1999. The allotment for each agency shall be the statewide per pupil amount times the SELPA’s special education pupil count reported as of December 1999. The superintendent shall adjust the computations in such a manner as to ensure that the minimum allotment to each SELPA is at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(C) From the appropriation provided by subdivision (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section, the amount of six million dollars ($6,000,000) shall be allocated by the superintendent to the Riverside County Office of Education.

(2) The superintendent shall compute a per pupil amount from the balance of the appropriation provided by subdivision (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section, after the appropriation has been reduced by the amounts in paragraph (1), by dividing the remaining portion of the appropriation by the total average daily attendance, excluding attendance for regional occupational centers and programs, adult education, and programs operated by the county superintendents of schools, for all pupils in kindergarten through grade 12 in all school districts as used by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the second principal apportionment for the 1999–2000 fiscal year.

The superintendent shall apportion to each school district an amount equal to the per pupil amount times the district’s reported average daily attendance for the second principal apportionment for the 1999–2000 fiscal year, excluding attendance for regional occupational centers and programs, adult education, and programs operated by the county superintendent of schools.

(c) The amounts appropriated by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4 of the act adding this section are in full satisfaction and in lieu of mandate claims resulting from the Commission on State Mandates cases identified as (1) Riverside County Superintendent of Schools, et al., CSM-3986 on remand from the Superior Court of Sacramento County, No. 352795, and (2) Long Beach Unified School District, CSM-3986A (consolidated with the Santa Barbara County Superintendent of Schools, SB 90-3453).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 203, Sec. 3.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.158.

(a) (1) The superintendent shall determine the statewide total average daily attendance used for the purposes of Section 56836.08 for the 2000–01 fiscal year. For the purposes of this calculation, the 2000–01 second principal average daily attendance for the court, community school, and special education programs served by the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education special education local plan area shall be used in lieu of the average daily attendance used for that agency for the purposes of Section 56836.08.

(2) The superintendent shall distribute the amount appropriated for purposes of this section from the Budget Act of 2001. The superintendent shall divide that amount of funding by the amount calculated in paragraph (1).

(3) For each special education local plan area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 56836.10 for the 2001–02 fiscal year by the quotient determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of this section. This increase shall be effective beginning in the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), for the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education special education local plan area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 56836.10 by the ratio of the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2) to the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2000–01 fiscal year. This increase shall be effective beginning in the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(5) The superintendent shall increase the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2001–02 fiscal year by the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(b) (1) The superintendent shall determine the statewide total average daily attendance used for the purposes of Section 56836.08 for the 2001–02 fiscal year. For the purposes of this calculation, the 2001–02 second principal average daily attendance for the court, community school, and special education programs served by the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education special education local plan area shall be used in lieu of the average daily attendance used for that agency for the purposes of Section 56836.08.

(2) The superintendent shall distribute the amount appropriated for purposes of this section from the Budget Act of 2002. The superintendent shall divide that amount of funding by the amount calculated in paragraph (1).

(3) For each special education local plan area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 56836.10 for the 2002–03 fiscal year by the quotient determined pursuant to paragraph (2). This increase shall be effective commencing in the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), for the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education special education local plan area, the superintendent shall permanently increase the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 56836.10 by the ratio of the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2) to the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2001–02 fiscal year. This increase shall be effective commencing in the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(5) The superintendent shall increase the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the 2002–03 fiscal year by the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1167, Sec. 23.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.159.

(a) For the 2001–02 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute a permanent adjustment for each special education local plan area as determined by this section.

(b) The Superintendent shall rank each special education local plan area by its funding level per unit of average daily attendance as determined by dividing the amount calculated for each special education local plan area for the 2001–02 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.08 plus the amount provided to each special education local plan area pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.158 by each special education local plan area’s average daily attendance upon which funding is
 based for the 2001–02 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.13.

(c) The Superintendent shall increase the special education local plan areas with the lowest level of funding per unit of average daily attendance as determined in subdivision (b) to that of the special education local plan area with the next highest level of funding per unit of average daily attendance by allocating an amount from that available for this purpose from the Budget Act to the lowest level special education local plan areas. The amount to be allocated shall equal the difference between the funding level per unit of average daily attendance of the lowest level special education local plan areas and the next highest level special education local plan area multiplied by the average daily attendance upon which funding is based for the 2001–02 fiscal year
 pursuant to Section 56836.13 of the lowest level special education local plan areas.

(d) If there is additional funding available after the allocation pursuant to subdivision (c), the allocation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be repeated until all the funds appropriated for this purpose in the Budget Act have been used. If the amount appropriated for the purposes of this section from the 2001–02 Budget Act is not sufficient to fully fund the allocation pursuant to subdivision (c), the funding provided to each special education local plan area in the last iteration pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be prorated.

(e) The amount, if any, computed pursuant to subdivision (c) and subdivision (d) for each special education local plan area shall be a permanent increase and shall, commencing in the
 2002–03 fiscal year, be included in the prior year amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 56836.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 77.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensed Children’s Institutions [56836.165. - 56836.18.]

56836.165.

(a) For the 2004–05 to 2020–21 fiscal years, inclusive, the Superintendent shall calculate for each special education local plan area an amount based on (1) the number of children and youth residing in foster family homes, small family homes, and foster family agencies, (2) the licensed capacity of group homes licensed by the State Department of Social Services, and (3) the number of children and youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in skilled nursing facilities or intermediate care facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services and the number of children and youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in community care facilities licensed by the State Department of Social
 Services.

(b) The department shall assign each facility described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) a severity rating. The severity ratings shall be on a scale from 1 to 14, inclusive. Foster family homes and small family homes shall be assigned a severity rating of 1. Foster family agencies shall be assigned a severity rating of 2. Facilities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be assigned the same severity rating as its State Department of Social Services rate classification level. For facilities described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), skilled nursing facilities shall be assigned a severity rating of 14, intermediate care facilities shall be assigned a severity rating of 11, and community care facilities shall be assigned a severity rating of 8.

(c) (1) The department shall establish a “bed allowance” for each severity level. For the 2004–05 fiscal year, the bed allowance shall be calculated as
 described in paragraph (2). For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall increase the bed allowance by the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to Section 42238.1. The department shall not establish a bed allowance for any facility described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) if it is not licensed by the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) (A) The bed allowance for severity level 1 shall be five hundred two dollars ($502).

(B) The bed allowance for severity level 2 shall be six hundred ten dollars ($610).

(C) The bed allowance for severity level 3 shall be one thousand four hundred thirty-four dollars ($1,434).

(D) The bed
 allowance for severity level 4 shall be one thousand six hundred forty-nine dollars ($1,649).

(E) The bed allowance for severity level 5 shall be one thousand eight hundred sixty-five dollars ($1,865).

(F) The bed allowance for severity level 6 shall be two thousand eighty dollars ($2,080).

(G) The bed allowance for severity level 7 shall be two thousand two hundred ninety-five dollars ($2,295).

(H) The bed allowance for severity level 8 shall be two thousand five hundred ten dollars ($2,510).

(I) The bed allowance for severity level 9 shall be five thousand four hundred fifty-one dollars ($5,451).

(J) The bed allowance for
 severity level 10 shall be five thousand eight hundred eighty-one dollars ($5,881).

(K) The bed allowance for severity level 11 shall be nine thousand four hundred sixty-seven dollars ($9,467).

(L) The bed allowance for severity level 12 shall be thirteen thousand four hundred eighty-three dollars ($13,483).

(M) The bed allowance for severity level 13 shall be fourteen thousand three hundred forty-three dollars ($14,343).

(N) The bed allowance for severity level 14 shall be twenty thousand eighty-one dollars ($20,081).

(d) (1) For each fiscal year, the department shall calculate an out-of-home care funding amount for each special education local plan area as the sum
 of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), and (4). The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide the State Department of Education with the residential counts identified in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(2) The number of children and youth residing on April 1 in foster family homes, small family homes, and foster family agencies located in each special education local plan area multiplied by the appropriate bed allowance.

(3) The capacity on April 1 of each group home licensed by the State Department of Social Services located in each special education local plan area multiplied by the appropriate bed allowance.

(4) The number on April 1 of children and youth (A) 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental
 Services who are residing in skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services located in each special education local plan area multiplied by the appropriate bed allowance, and (B) 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in community care facilities licensed by the State Department of Social Services located in each special education local plan area multiplied by the appropriate bed allowance.

(5) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and paragraphs (2) and (3), for purposes of the out-of-home care funding amount for group homes, foster family homes, small family homes, and foster family agencies for the 2017–18 to 2020–21 fiscal years, inclusive, the Superintendent shall use the data received from the State Department of Social Services that was used for the funding for the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(e) In determining the amount of the first principal apportionment for a fiscal year pursuant to Section 41332, the Superintendent shall continue to apportion funds from Section A of the State School Fund to each special education local plan area equal to the amount apportioned at the advance apportionment pursuant to Section 41330 for that fiscal year.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), for purposes of the 2016–17 fiscal year funding for group homes, the Superintendent shall use the rate classification levels as they existed on December 31, 2016, and the capacity of each group home licensed by the State Department of Social Services located in each special education local plan area on December 31, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 99.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.168.

(a) For the 2021–22 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall calculate for each special education local plan area an amount based on the sum of all of the following amounts:

(1) (A) The amount of funding generated by all foster youth. This amount shall be calculated as the sum of cumulative enrollment for foster youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.01, multiplied by the rate described in subparagraph (B). Cumulative enrollment shall be calculated at the local educational agency reporting level and use data produced by the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to Section 60900. For purposes of this subparagraph, “local educational
 agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(B) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the rate shall be one thousand five hundred nine dollars ($1,509). For each fiscal year thereafter, the rate shall be the amount calculated for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph, adjusted each year by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142.

(2) (A) (i) For the 2021–22 to 2023–24 fiscal years, inclusive, the amount of funding generated by short-term residential therapeutic program placements. This amount shall be calculated as the average daily population at short-term residential therapeutic programs
 located within the boundaries of the special education local plan area, which shall include the average daily population at short-term residential therapeutic programs that open or close in the middle of a fiscal year, multiplied by the rate described in subparagraph (B).

(ii) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of funding generated by short-term residential therapeutic program placements and community treatment facility placements. This amount shall be calculated as the average daily population at short-term residential therapeutic programs and community treatment facilities located within the boundaries of the special education local plan area, which shall include the average daily population at short-term residential therapeutic programs and community treatment facilities that open or close in the middle of a fiscal year,
 multiplied by the rate described in subparagraph (B).

(B) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the rate shall be fourteen thousand six hundred three dollars ($14,603). For each fiscal year thereafter, the rate shall be the amount calculated for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph, adjusted each year by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142.

(3) The amount of funding generated by children and youth placed by the State Department of Developmental Services, calculated as follows:

(A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of all of the following amounts:

(i) The number of children and youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in community care
 facilities licensed by the State Department of Social Services multiplied by a rate of three thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($3,358).

(ii) The number of children and youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in intermediate care facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services multiplied by a rate of twelve thousand six hundred sixty-eight dollars ($12,668).

(iii) The number of children and youth 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, referred by the State Department of Developmental Services who are residing in skilled nursing facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services multiplied by a rate of twenty-six thousand eight hundred seventy-four dollars ($26,874).

(B) For each fiscal year following the
 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of the amounts described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A), except that the rates used to calculate those amounts shall be the rates calculated for the prior fiscal year, adjusted each year by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142.

(b) For each charter school deemed a local educational agency for purposes of special education, only an amount equal to the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be apportioned by the Superintendent.
